Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2476
Prescription drug or device or legend drug or device, defined.

(1) Prescription drug or device or legend drug or device means a drug or device:

(a) Which is required under federal law to be labeled with one of the following statements prior to being dispensed or delivered:

(i) Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription;

(ii) Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian; or

(iii) "Rx Only"; or

(b) Which is required by any applicable federal or state law to be dispensed pursuant only to a prescription or chart order or which is restricted to use by practitioners only.

(2) Prescription drug or device or legend drug or device does not include a type of device, including supplies and device components, which carries the federal Food and Drug Administration legend "Caution: Federal law restricts this device to sale by or on the order of a licensed health care practitioner" or an alternative legend approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration which it recognizes, in published guidance, as conveying essentially the same message.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 20.